District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5715

Individual violations of provisions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1315, ch. 854, § 763
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 470(h), 32 DCR 4450
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1215.
1973 Ed., § 35-915.

Editor's Notes

Section 35-1215 § 31-5715, 2001 Ed. was also amended by D.C. Law 12-81 to validate a previously made technical correction.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5702.